Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0405.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 101. (1) This act shall be known and may be cited as the "administration of opioid antagonists act". (2) As used in this act: (a) "Agency" means a governmental agency. (b) "Employee or agent" means any of the following: (i) An individual who is employed by, or under contract with, an agency. (ii) An individual who serves on the governing body of an agency. (iii) An individual who volunteers with an agency. (c) "Governmental agency" means this state or a political subdivision. but Governmental agency does not include a any of the following: (i) A person licensed under part 209 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20901 to 333.20979. (ii) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or the board of directors of a public school academy. (d) "Intermediate school district" means that term as defined in section 4 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.4. (e) (d) "Municipal corporation" means a city, village, or township or a combination of 2 or more of these when acting jointly. (f) (e) "Opioid antagonist" means naloxone hydrochloride or any other similarly acting and equally safe drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of drug overdose. (g) (f) "Opioid-related overdose" means a condition, including, but not limited to, extreme physical illness, decreased level of consciousness, respiratory depression, coma, or death, that results from the consumption or use of an opioid or another substance with which an opioid was combined or that a reasonable person would believe to be an opioid-related overdose that requires medical assistance. (h) (g) "Political subdivision" means a municipal corporation, county, county road commission, school district, community college district, public library, port district, metropolitan district, or transportation authority or a combination of 2 or more of these when acting jointly; a district or authority authorized by law or formed by 1 or more political subdivisions; or an agency, department, court, board, or council of a political subdivision. (i) "Public school academy" means that term as defined in section 5 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.5. (j) "School district" means that term as defined in section 6 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.6. (k) (h) "State" means this state and its agencies, departments, commissions, courts, boards, councils, and statutorily created task forces. State includes a public university or college of this state, whether established as a constitutional corporation or otherwise. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 404 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.